Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6142.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 10jj. (1) The commission shall not approve a tariff, rate, or contract between a data center and an electric utility unless the tariff, rate, or contract requires a decommissioning plan that ensures the decommissioning, dismantling, and remediating of the data center property to a condition similar to that which existed before construction of the data center. The decommissioning plan must include, but is not limited to, financial assurance in the form of a performance bond, letter of credit, or escrow account. The amount of the financial assurance must not be less than the estimated cost of decommissioning the data center, as calculated by the commission or a qualified independent third-party approved by the commission. The commission shall review the financial assurance every 3 years to ensure that there is sufficient money available to decommission, dismantle, and remediate the data center property. (2) As used in this section, "data center" means a facility in this state that is composed of 1 or more buildings and that is designed and intended for housing, and does house, data center equipment to centralize the storage and processing of data. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S06933'26) or House Bill No. 6135 (request no. H06933'26). (b) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S06934'26) or House Bill No. 6139 (request no. H06934'26). (c) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S06939'26) or House Bill No. 6137 (request no. H06939'26). (d) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S06942'26) or House Bill No. 6140 (request no. H06942'26). (e) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S06965'26) or House Bill No. 6138 (request no. H06965'26). (f) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S07181'26) or House Bill No. 6141 (request no. H07181'26).